Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB915.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XV-OCHILD AND ADULT CARE FOOD PROGRAM SUPPLEMENTSection 1501-O. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth.12345678910111213141516171819 "Enrollee." An individual enrolled in a program-participating facility and defined as eligible for the program under 42 U.S.C. § 1766 (relating to child and adult care food program)."Facility." An eligible care center, as defined under 42 U.S.C. § 1766 receiving reimbursements for meals served to enrollees under the program."Program." The Child and Adult Care Food Program as established under 42 U.S.C. § 1766 and administered by the Federal and State agencies as provided by law."Supplement." The Child and Adult Care Food Program Supplement established in this article, which shall constitute supplemental financial reimbursements under the program to facilities for food that they serve to enrollees.Section 1502-O. Establishment and administration of supplement.(a) Establishment.--The Child and Adult Care Food Program Supplement is established.(b) Administration.--The department shall:(1) Administer the supplement, which shall include, to every extent possible, the coordination of financial reimbursements with other State departments and agencies as necessary.(2) Develop rules and regulations necessary to administer the supplement.Section 1503-O. Funding.The General Assembly shall appropriate funds from the General Fund to the department for the purpose of administering the program.Section 1504-O. Procedures.(a) Applications.-- To implement the supplement during and 20250HB0915PN0964 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 after the initial round of funding, the department shall request applications for funding from facilities. Applications shall be provided in electronic and physical form.(b) Criteria.--The department may award a supplement to a facility in accordance with the following:(1) For the first round of funding for a facility, or in the case of a facility that receives reimbursements under the program but did not receive a supplement during the previous year, the department shall award funding to the facility that demonstrates the ability of the facility to:(i) Better serve food to additional enrollees.(ii) Do any of the following:(A) If the facility is a nonprofit organization or an emergency shelter, bolster the facility's near-term and long-term fiscal stability or provide for further care and educational opportunities for the facility's enrollees.(B) If the facility is a for-profit organization, provide for further care and educational opportunities for the facility's enrollees.(2) If the facility received reimbursements in the initial round of funding or received funding any year after through the supplement, the facility must demonstrate that the supplemental financial reimbursements allowed, and will continue to allow, the facility to:(i) Better serve food to additional enrollees.(ii) Do any of the following:(A) If the facility is a nonprofit organization or an emergency shelter, bolster the facility's near-20250HB0915PN0964 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 term and long-term fiscal stability or provide for further care and educational opportunities for the facility's enrollees.(B) If the facility is a for-profit organization, provide for further care and educational opportunities for the facility's enrollees.Section 1505-O. Priority in funding.The department shall prioritize funding under the supplement in a manner, as determined by the department, that maximizes the number of enrollees who are fully nourished while in the care of the facilities.Section 1506-O. Annual report.(a) General requirement.--No later than the June 1 following the date of each appropriation under section 1503-O, the department shall compile an annual report on the program and the supplement.(b) Submittal.--Each annual report shall be submitted to the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Aging and Youth Committee of the Senate.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Aging and Older Adult Services Committee of the House of Representatives.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Children and Youth Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the 20250HB0915PN0964 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(7) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.(8) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(c) Contents.--Each annual report shall include the following:(1) The number of facilities participating in the program.(2) The number of those facilities participating in the supplement.(3) The number of meals served through the program with and without the supplement.(4) A summary of the types of meals served to enrollees.(5) The amount of money projected to be necessary during the next year to allow all enrollees to receive nutritious meals and snacks.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0915PN0964 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718